Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Penalties

387.990.
Penalties.

Any person who wrongfully causes or conspires with or assists another in causing the unwarranted determination of disability or partial disability of any individual under KRS

387.500

to

387.770

or the denial of any individual of any rights accorded to him under the provisions of KRS

387.500

to

387.770

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who intentionally violates the confidentiality of any records or reports under KRS

387.500

to

387.770

shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 29, effective July 1, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Guardians and Conservators (Mentally Disabled Persons), § 260.00.